Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-409
Board; minute book; vacancies; how filled.

The board shall keep a minute book of its proceedings, which shall be open at all reasonable times to public inspection. Vacancies appearing on the board shall be filled by the county board in like manner as regular appointments to the board are made.

Laws 1941, c. 148, § 1, p. 583;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-411;

R.S.1943, § 72-409.